Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4008.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 33-1260.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-1260.01. Rental property; unit owner and agent information; fee; disclosure A. A unit owner may use the unit owner's unit as a rental property unless prohibited in the declaration and shall use it in accordance with the declaration's rental time period restrictions. B. A unit owner may designate in writing a third party to act as the unit owner's agent with respect to all association matters relating to the rental unit, except for voting in association elections and serving on the board of directors.  The unit owner shall sign the written designation and shall provide a copy of the written designation to the association.  On delivery of the written designation, the association is authorized to conduct all association business relating to the unit owner's rental unit through the designated agent. Any notice given by the association to a unit owner's designated agent on any matter relating to the unit owner's rental unit constitutes notice to the unit owner. C. Notwithstanding any provision in the condominium documents, on rental of a unit, an association shall not require a unit owner or a unit owner's agent to disclose any information regarding a tenant other than the name and contact information for any adults occupying the unit, the time period of the lease, including the beginning and ending dates of the tenancy, and a description and the license plate numbers of the tenants' vehicles. If the condominium is an age restricted age-restricted condominium, the unit owner, the unit owner's agent or the tenant shall show a government issued identification that bears a photograph and that confirms that the tenant meets the condominium's age restrictions or requirements. D. On request of an association or its managing agent for the disclosures prescribed in subsection C of this section, the managing agent or, if there is no managing agent, the association may charge a fee of not more than twenty-five dollars $25, which shall be paid within fifteen days after the postmarked request.  The fee may be charged for each new tenancy for that unit but may not be charged for a renewal of a lease.  Except for the fee permitted by this subsection and fees related to the use of recreational facilities, the association or its managing agent shall not assess, levy or charge a fee or fine or otherwise impose a requirement on a unit owner's rental unit any differently than on an owner-occupied unit in the association. E. Notwithstanding any provision in the condominium documents, the association is prohibited from doing any of the following: 1. Requiring a unit owner to provide the association with a copy of the tenant's rental application, credit report, lease agreement or rental contract or other personal information except as prescribed by this section. This paragraph does not prohibit the association from acquiring a credit report on a person in an attempt to collect a debt. 2. Requiring the tenant to sign a waiver or other document limiting the tenant's due process rights as a condition of the tenant's occupancy of the rental unit. 3. Prohibiting or otherwise restricting a unit owner from serving on the board of directors based on the owner's not being an occupant of the unit. 4. Imposing on a unit owner or managing agent any fee, assessment, penalty or other charge in an amount greater than fifteen dollars $15 for incomplete or late information regarding the information requested pursuant to subsection C of this section. F. Any attempt by an association to exceed the fee, assessment, penalty or other charge authorized by subsection D or E of this section voids the fee, assessment, penalty or other charge authorized by subsection D or E of this section.  This section does not prevent an association from complying with the housing for older persons act of 1995 (P.L. 10476; 109 Stat. 787). G. An owner may use a crime free crime-free addendum as part of a lease agreement.  This section does not prohibit the owner's use of a crime free crime-free addendum except that any provision in that crime-free addendum that allows for or requires the eviction of a tenant based on the criminal conviction of a tenant or a tenant's guest is unenforceable. H. This section does not prohibit and an association may lawfully enforce a provision in the condominium documents that restricts the residency of persons who are required to be registered pursuant to section 13-3821 and who are classified as level two or level three offenders. I. An owner of rental property shall abate criminal activity as authorized in section 12-991. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 33-1314, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-1314. Terms and conditions of rental agreement; contact information; property; pets A. The landlord and tenant may include in a rental agreement terms and conditions not prohibited by this chapter or any other law, including rent, term of the agreement and other provisions governing the rights and obligations of the parties. B. In the absence of a rental agreement, the tenant shall pay as rent the fair rental value for using and occupying the dwelling unit. C. Rent shall be payable without demand or notice at the time and place agreed on by the parties. Unless otherwise agreed, rent is payable at the dwelling unit and periodic rent is payable at the beginning of any term of one month or less and otherwise in equal monthly installments at the beginning of each month. Unless otherwise agreed, rent shall be uniformly apportionable from day-to-day. D. Unless the rental agreement fixes a definite term, the tenancy shall be week-to-week in case of a roomer who pays weekly rent, and in all other cases month-to-month. E. Notwithstanding section 14-3911, the landlord may request and the tenant may provide and routinely update the name and contact information of a person who is authorized by the tenant to enter the tenant's dwelling unit to retrieve and store the tenant's property, including the tenant's animal, if the tenant dies or is otherwise incapacitated. If the landlord is unable to contact the authorized person at the address and telephone number provided to the landlord by the tenant or the authorized person fails to respond to the landlord's request within one day for the animal or ten days for all other property after initial written contact, the landlord may dispose of the property as prescribed in section 33-1370 or may deem the animal abandoned, and if deemed abandoned, shall remove and release the animal to an animal shelter or boarding facility as prescribed in section 33-1370, subsection E. The landlord may release the animal to a relative of the deceased or incapacitated tenant if any of the following applies: 1. The landlord was not provided the contact information of a person who is authorized by the tenant to retrieve the tenant's animal. 2. The contact information is no longer valid. 3. The landlord is unable to contact the authorized person after one calendar day. F. Before removing any of the tenant's personal property or the tenant's animal, the authorized person shall present to the landlord a valid government issued identification that confirms the identity of the authorized person. The authorized person shall have twenty days after the date of initial written contact by the landlord or the last date for which rent is paid, whichever is longer, to remove items from the rental property and return keys to the landlord during regular business hours.  If the landlord allows an authorized person to enter the property to remove the tenant's personal possessions as prescribed by this subsection, the landlord has no further liability to the tenant, the tenant's estate or the tenant's heirs for lost, damaged or stolen items. If the tenant's personal property is not entirely removed from the rental unit by an authorized person, the landlord may dispose of the property as prescribed in section 33-1370. G. Subsections E and F of this section apply only as follows: 1. To the tenant's personal property if the periodic rent is unpaid and outstanding for at least five days. 2. To the tenant's animal if the tenant is deceased or is otherwise incapacitated. H. If a landlord uses a CRIME-free addendum as part of a lease agreement, any provision in that crime-free addendum that allows for or requires the eviction of a tenant based on the criminal conviction of a tenant or a tenant's guest is unenforceable. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 33-1806.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-1806.01. Rental property; member and agent information; fee; disclosure A. A member may use the member's property as a rental property unless prohibited in the declaration and shall use it in accordance with the declaration's rental time period restrictions. B. A member may designate in writing a third party to act as the member's agent with respect to all association matters relating to the rental property, except for voting in association elections and serving on the board of directors. The member shall sign the written designation and shall provide a copy of the written designation to the association. On delivery of the written designation, the association is authorized to conduct all association business relating to the member's rental property through the designated agent. Any notice given by the association to a member's designated agent on any matter relating to the member's rental property constitutes notice to the member. C. Notwithstanding any provision in the community documents, on rental of a member's property, an association shall not require a member or a member's agent to disclose any information regarding a tenant other than the name and contact information for any adults occupying the property, the time period of the lease, including the beginning and ending dates of the tenancy, and a description and the license plate numbers of the tenants' vehicles. If the planned community is an age restricted age-restricted community, the member, the member's agent or the tenant shall show a government issued identification that bears a photograph and that confirms that the tenant meets the community's age restrictions or requirements. D. On request of an association or its managing agent for the disclosures prescribed in subsection C of this section, the managing agent or, if there is no managing agent, the association may charge a fee of not more than twenty-five dollars $25, which shall be paid within fifteen days after the postmarked request.  The fee may be charged for each new tenancy for that property but may not be charged for a renewal of a lease. Except for the fee permitted by this subsection and fees related to the use of recreational facilities, the association or its managing agent shall not assess, levy or charge a fee or fine or otherwise impose a requirement on a member's rental property any differently than on an owner-occupied property in the association. E. Notwithstanding any provision in the community documents, the association is prohibited from doing any of the following: 1. Requiring a member to provide the association with a copy of the tenant's rental application, credit report, lease agreement or rental contract or other personal information except as prescribed by this section. This paragraph does not prohibit the association from acquiring a credit report on a person in an attempt to collect a debt. 2. Requiring the tenant to sign a waiver or other document limiting the tenant's due process rights as a condition of the tenant's occupancy of the rental property. 3. Prohibiting or otherwise restricting a member from serving on the board of directors based on the member's not being an occupant of the property. 4. Imposing on a member or managing agent any fee, assessment, penalty or other charge in an amount greater than fifteen dollars $15 for incomplete or late information regarding the information requested pursuant to subsection C of this section. F. Any attempt by an association to exceed the fee, assessment, penalty or other charge authorized by subsection D or E of this section voids the fee, assessment, penalty or other charge authorized by subsection D or E of this section. This section does not prevent an association from complying with the housing for older persons act of 1995 (P.L. 10476; 109 Stat. 787). G. An owner may use a crime free crime-free addendum as part of a lease agreement. This section does not prohibit the owner's use of a crime free crime-free addendum except that any provision in a crime-free addendum that allows for or requires the eviction of a tenant based on the criminal conviction of a tenant or a tenant's guest is unenforceable. H. This section does not prohibit and an association may lawfully enforce a provision in the community documents that restricts the residency of persons who are required to be registered pursuant to section 13-3821 and who are classified as level two or level three offenders. I. An owner of rental property shall abate criminal activity as authorized in section 12-991. END_STATUTE